Maryland, session 2025, SB0889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Distribute” means to give, sell, transfer, disseminate, publish, upload,
circulate, broadcast, make available, allow access to, or engage in any other form of
transmission, electronic or otherwise.
(3) “Harm” means:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0889*

SENATE BILL 889
(i) physical injury;
(ii) serious emotional distress; or
(iii) economic damages.
3–810.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISTRIBUTE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) “HARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) (I) “INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 10–101 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(II) “INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION” INCLUDES
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT AWARD DEGREES AT THE ASSOCIATE
AND BACCALAUREATE LEVELS.
(5) “INSTITUTION OF SECONDARY EDUCATION” MEANS A SCHOOL OR
ANY OTHER INSTITUTION THAT ENROLLS STUDENTS IN GRADES 6 THROUGH 12.
(6) “PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION” INCLUDES A PERSON’S:
(I) NAME;
(II) ADDRESS;
(III) TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(IV) DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER;
(V) SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(VI) PLACE OF EMPLOYMENT;
(VII) EMPLOYEE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(VIII) HEALTH INSURANCE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;

SENATE BILL 889 3
(IX) MEDICAL IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(X) MOTHER’S MAIDEN NAME;
(XI) BANK OR OTHER FINANCIAL INSTITUTION ACCOUNT
NUMBER;
(XII) DATE OF BIRTH;
(XIII) PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(XIV) UNIQUE BIOMETRIC DATA, INCLUDING FINGERPRINT,
VOICEPRINT, RETINA OR IRIS IMAGE, OR OTHER UNIQUE PHYSICAL
REPRESENTATION;
(XV) DIGITAL SIGNATURE;
(XVI) CREDIT CARD NUMBER OR OTHER PAYMENT DEVICE
NUMBER; AND
(XVII) SCHOOL ADDRESS.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY DISTRIBUTE THE PERSONAL
IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OR IMAGE OF A STUDENT ENROLLED IN AN
INSTITUTION OF SECONDARY EDUCATION OR AN INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION:
(1) WITHOUT THE EXPRESS PERMISSION OF THE STUDENT OR, IF THE
STUDENT IS UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS, THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE
STUDENT; AND
(2) WITH:
(I) INTENT OR KNOWLEDGE THAT THE PERSONAL IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION OR IMAGE WILL BE USED TO HARM THE STUDENT; OR
(II) RECKLESS DISREGARD FOR THE RISK THAT THE PERSONAL
IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OR IMAGE WILL BE USED TO HARM THE STUDENT.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.

SENATE BILL 889
(D) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED OR APPLIED IN A MANNER THAT
VIOLATES AN INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO FREE SPEECH UNDER THE U.S.
CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.